Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 268 Drainage and Reclamation Act of 1918

268.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Appraisers” means the board of appraisers appointed by the court.

“Board” means the board of drainage commissioners of the district.

“District” or “drainage district” means any drainage, levee or reclamation district established under this chapter or under the control of the board.

“Drain” includes any ditch, canal, sewer, channel, watercourse, conduit, stream, creek, river, pond, lake, bayou, sluice, or excavation used for the drainage or reclamation of wet or swampy land.

“Improvement” means any drain or other work provided for in KRS

268.510

, constructed or used for the purposes set out in this chapter.

“Owner” means any person owning a freehold estate in any property in the district or affected by it according to the report of the board of viewers, and shall not include trustees or mortgagees.

“Property” includes land, railroads, sewers, streets and public highways.

“Sheriff” means any collecting officer.

“Viewers” means the board of viewers appointed by the court.

History.

2380b-1, 2380b-3, 2380b-5, 2380b-6, 2380b-12, 2380b-18, 2380b-20, 2380b-28a, 2380b-32, 2380b-36, 2380b-40, 2380b-41, 2380b-43, 2380b-50, 2380b-57, 2380b-58, 2380b-61.

268.015.
Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

All boards established under this chapter shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 40, § 77, effective March 21, 2013.

268.020.
County may establish district.

Any county may, in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.182

, establish, organize, and provide for the operation and maintenance of drainage, levee and reclamation districts.

History.

2380b-1, 2380b-2: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 104, § 17; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 225, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 100, § 28, effective July 13, 1984.

268.030.
Proceedings to establish district — County that has jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

268.040.
Petition for improvement — Bond. [Repealed.]

268.050.
Petition to refer to this chapter. [Repealed.]

268.060.
Board of viewers — Appointment — Qualifications — Oath. [Repealed.]

268.070.
Examination and report of viewers. [Repealed.]

268.080.
Notice of fiscal court proceeding. [Repealed.]

268.090.
Clerk’s certificate of notice. [Repealed.]

268.100.
Proceeding on unfavorable viewers’ report. [Repealed.]

268.110.
Clerk’s certificate constitutes service on process—Jurisdiction of court. [Repealed.]

268.120.
No change of venue — Special judge shall act. [Repealed.]

268.130.
Hearings by court on exceptions to viewers’ report. [Repealed.]

268.140.
Order establishes district — Owners bound by order — Fees of county officers — Duties of clerk. [Repealed.]

268.150.
Orders referring district to board and continuing proceedings. [Repealed.]

268.160.
Election of board — Qualifications — Bond — Officers — Powers.

The county judge/executive shall divide the district into three (3) precincts as nearly equal in area as practicable, following owners’ property lines, and immediately upon such division he shall appoint a temporary secretary to act for the district board. The secretary for the board shall record the result of the division of the district into precincts in the drainage record.

The secretary shall give twenty (20) days’ notice by posting three (3) notices in each precinct of the district and by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, informing the owners of the district that they may vote for a drainage commissioner for each precinct and a secretary for the board and the district, within a stated time. The vote shall be taken by the owners filing a written designation of choice, together with the number of acres the voter owns in the district, or if benefits have been confirmed the amount of benefits assessed against the owner’s land, with the county judge/executive. Each acre owned and assessed in the district shall count one (1) vote, or if benefits have been confirmed each one hundred dollars ($100) or fraction thereof in benefits assessed against the voter’s land shall count one (1) vote for secretary and drainage commissioner. The votes of the owners, when cast and filed with the county judge/executive, shall be recorded by the secretary of the board in the drainage record immediately after the expiration of the time for casting the vote. Votes shall be filed with the county judge/executive by the first Monday in April for drainage commissioner and for secretary, for a term of one (1) year beginning on the first Monday of May following. If there is a tie vote in any contest the judge of the county where the district has been established shall cast the deciding vote.

The board shall consist of three (3) members, being the persons who have received the largest number of votes in each of the three (3) precincts. The secretary shall be the party who received the largest number of votes from the district at large for that office. The board shall elect some responsible resident of the district, who is not a member of or secretary to the board, as treasurer. The treasurer shall be paid whatever salary the board deems proper, and shall execute bond as the board directs. One (1) month after the advertised election is completed, or on the first Monday in May if not an advertised election, the elected officers shall take charge of the drainage record and all records, maps, papers and property belonging to the district, except money in the hands of the treasurer.

No one except an owner of land in the precinct for which he acts shall be eligible for drainage commissioner. Each commissioner shall be a freeholder and over twenty-one (21) years of age. The board shall have control of all improvements in the district, except as otherwise provided. Vacancies in the office of board member or secretary shall be filled by a special election after due advertising. Each drainage commissioner when elected shall execute bond for the faithful performance of his duties in the sum of $2,500 and shall be sworn to perform the duties of his office to the best of his ability.

Immediately upon election and qualification, the board shall become a body corporate, under the name and style of the “Board of Drainage Commissioners of . . . . . District,” with all the powers of a corporation or as necessary to carry on its work. It shall use a corporate seal which it may change at pleasure. The board shall elect from among its members a president, and a vice president.

History.

2380b-12: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 189, §§ 1, 2; 1944, ch. 109, § 2; 1966, ch. 239, § 190.

268.170.
Office and meetings of the board — Records — Reports — Expenses.

The board shall furnish its secretary with the necessary office room, furniture, fixtures, stationery, maps, plats, typewriter, and postage. The board shall meet as often as necessary for the proper discharge of duties at whatever places these duties require within the county in which any part of the district lies. The board shall keep complete records of its proceedings, which shall be at all times open to the inspection of the public.

The treasurer of the board shall, by May 1 of each year, make a complete and itemized report of its accounts and doings during the previous year, showing the amount of money received and from what source and the amount paid out and for what purposes. This report shall be spread upon the records and open for public inspection, and shall be submitted to the Department for Local Government as required by KRS

65A.020

.

All expenses incurred by the board shall be taken out of drainage funds and not from any general funds of the county. The commissioners shall be paid not more than three dollars ($3) per day while actually engaged in the performance of their duties as well as all traveling expenses incurred in attending any meeting of the board or in the performance of their duties, to be paid out of the funds of the district.

History.

2380b-12: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 189, §§ 1, 2; 1966, ch. 239, § 191; 2013, ch. 40, § 78, effective March 21, 2013.

268.180.
Board levies preliminary tax — Purpose — Collection — Surplus to district fund.

As soon as a district is referred to it by the court, the board shall levy a uniform tax of not more than fifty cents ($0.50) per acre upon each acre of land within the district, as shown by the viewers’ report, to be used to pay the expenses incurred in establishing the district, or to be incurred in organizing the district, making surveys and assessing benefits and damages and to pay other expenses necessary to be incurred before the board may provide funds to pay the total cost of improvements of the district. If the boundaries of the district are extended so as to include property not described and contained in the report of the viewers approved by the court, the same uniform tax shall be made on such other property as soon as it is included in the district.

This tax shall be payable as soon as levied. If not paid by December 1 of the year in which it is levied, it shall become delinquent and be returned to the sheriff of the county in which the property is located by the board. It shall be collected by the sheriff in the same manner and bear the same penalty as general state and county taxes. This tax shall be a lien on the property against which it is levied from the time of the levy.

In case the sum received from the levy exceeds the total cost of items for which it has been levied, the surplus shall be placed in the general fund of the district and used to pay the cost of construction.

History.

2380b-13.

268.190.
Attorney for board — Duties — Assistants.

Within thirty (30) days after any district has been organized and referred to it, the board shall employ an attorney to advise it and to act for the district. This attorney shall conduct all actions in court where the district is interested, and advise the board and its employees or agents, and generally attend to all matters of a legal nature for the board and district. The board may, with the advice of the attorney, employ other attorneys.

History.

2380b-33.

268.200.
Superintendent of drainage — Assistants — Duties — Bond — Expenses.

The board may appoint a competent person as superintendent of drainage, who shall be subject to the orders of the board. He shall look after and keep clean, open and in good condition all public drains and other improvements under the charge of the board. The superintendent shall furnish bond to be approved by and in favor of the board, for the benefit of any party in interest. If no superintendent is appointed, the work provided for in this section may be done by the chief engineer, or other employees as the board may direct. The superintendent, with the approval of the board, may employ any help necessary to the performance of his duties. All expenses incurred shall be reported by the superintendent or other employee to the board, and the report shall show the improvement upon which the expense was incurred.

History.

2380b-51.

268.210.
Compensation of officers and employees — Selection of treasurer.

Attorneys selected by the petitioners to prepare and file ex parte petitions for the establishment of any district shall faithfully perform the duties of attorney in such proceedings, aid in the preparation of all reports of the viewers, and do any other work necessary until judgment is rendered on the exceptions to the viewers’ preliminary report, establishing or refusing to establish the district, at which time their duties shall cease. If the district is established the court organizing it shall allow the attorney representing the petitioners a reasonable fee for the service actually rendered, to be taxed as a part of the cost of the proceeding, and paid by the board out of the funds belonging to the district when funds come into their hands.

The compensation of the engineer who is a member of the board of viewers shall be fixed by the fiscal court at or before the time of his appointment, by order entered of record. The other viewers and the members of the board of appraisers shall be paid five dollars ($5) per day for the time actually engaged in performing their duties. Rodmen, chain carriers and other laborers employed in the improvement shall receive three dollars ($3) per day for their services.

The secretary of the board shall receive three dollars ($3) per day for attending the meetings of the board and ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred (100) words for matter required to be written or recorded by him.

The treasurer shall receive not more than one percent (1%) for receiving and disbursing funds under the control of the board. If any bank or any qualified person will execute proper bond and serve as treasurer without remuneration or will pay the district a fee for being allowed to serve as treasurer with the privilege of selecting the depository of the funds, that bank or person may be appointed treasurer within the discretion of the board. The board shall receive bids or terms from all the banks of the city where its office is located that desire to act as treasurer, and select the bank or person that will best serve the interest of the district.

The board, except where otherwise provided, shall by resolution at the time of employing or appointing any person to render services, provide for reasonable compensation for the work done and necessary expenses.

History.

2380b-40: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 234, effective January 2, 1978.

268.220.
Treasurer acts for all boards in county — Bond — Audit of books — Statement of accounts — Issue and form of warrant — Interest on unpaid warrants.

The treasurer of the board in any county shall hold the office of treasurer of all districts organized in that county, and shall receive and receipt for all the drainage assessments collected by the sheriff. He shall give bond in the amount fixed by the board. This bond shall remain in the custody of the president of the board and be kept separate from all papers in the custody of the secretary or treasurer. The treasurer shall keep all funds deposited in some bank, to be designated by the board. All interest paid on the fund shall be credited to the district. The board shall have the books of the treasurer audited by a competent accountant appointed by it, as of December 31 in each year, and shall file a copy of the auditor’s report with the clerk of the court where the district was organized, and publish a statement within thirty (30) days showing the amount of money received, the amount paid out during that year and the amount in the treasury at the beginning and end of the year.

The treasurer shall pay out funds of the district only on warrants issued by the board. Warrants shall be issued only on the order of the board at a regular meeting, of which a record shall be kept. Warrants shall be signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary. All warrants shall be in substantially the following form:

If any warrant is not paid when presented to the treasurer because of lack of funds in the treasury, that fact shall be endorsed on the back of the warrant, and it shall draw interest thereafter at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, until there is money on hand to pay it with interest then accumulated. No interest shall be allowed on any warrant after that time.

“$ fund No. of warrant treasurer of district No. of County (or Counties), Kentucky. “Pay to dollars out of the money in fund of the district. For . By order of board of drainage commissioners of County. This day of , 19 (Seal) President of board of drainage commissioners of County Attest: Secretary.”

Click to view

History.

2380b-31, 2380b-38.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bond of public officers, KRS

62.060

to

62.080

.

268.230.
Record of proceedings of the board.

The board shall keep a well-bound book entitled “Record of Board of Drainage Commissioners of
. . . . .
County, Kentucky,” in which shall be recorded the minutes of all meetings, proceedings, certificates, bonds given by all employees, accounts and expenditures allowed and orders paid and all corporate acts in reference to the district. This record shall be open at all times to the inspection of anyone interested.

History.

2380b-34.

268.240.
Board to keep account of time and expenses — Apportionment — Annual report of officers.

The board shall keep a correct account of the time spent by it, by the engineer, superintendent and all other employees, and of each item of expense incurred in connection with the district, and charge it to the district for which it was done. If the expense is upon more than one (1) district at the same time, it shall be apportioned between them. Every salary fixed by the board shall be apportioned by the board and paid out of the funds to the credit of the districts benefited. On the first Monday of December of each year all officers shall report in detail to the board.

History.

2380b-49.

268.250.
Chief engineer — Powers and duties — Report — Compensation of engineers.

When the board undertakes to establish or construct any improvement, it shall appoint a competent civil engineer as chief engineer, who may be an individual or a corporation, and who shall engage such assistants as the board approves. The chief engineer shall have control of the engineering work in the district. He may, with the consent of the board, consult any eminent engineer and obtain his opinion and advice concerning the plans for the district. He shall make all necessary surveys of the property within the district, and of any adjacent property that may be affected.

The engineer shall make a written report to the board, with maps and profiles of the surveys, containing a plan for draining, leveeing and reclaiming the property from overflow or damage by water. These maps and profiles shall also indicate, so far as necessary, the physical characteristics of the land and the location of any cities, public roads, streets, railroads, drains and other property located on the land. The report shall also contain an accurate description of each tract of land within the district, giving the name of the owner and his post office address, and a statement showing the quantity of land. The report shall also include a property map, showing the boundary of each tract of land, the quantity of land in each tract, the name of the owner, and all streams, roads, railroads, and the location of all proposed improvements. Everything filed by the engineer shall be made in triplicate by him, one (1) marked original and the others duplicates. The original shall not be withdrawn from the custody of the secretary of the board, but the duplicates may be withdrawn for use by the viewers, the board, or for use on the work by the engineer or contractor, receipted for by the person withdrawing it and returned in due time.

The compensation to engineers for making the preliminary survey and plan shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per day and actual expenses. The compensation of any consulting engineer shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per day, nor shall a consulting engineer in any district be employed for more than ten (10) days. All engineering fees in the organization of a district under employment by the board shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the gross cost of the improvement made. When any fees are sought to be allowed in excess of the above schedule and entered into the total costs as the basis for making the levy of assessments, permission shall first be obtained from the fiscal court.

History.

2380b-14, 2380b-55: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 235, effective January 2, 1978.

268.260.
Plan for reclamation — Board appoints appraisers — Duties — Oath — Election of chairman.

The report of the chief engineer shall be known as the “plan for reclamation.” When it is filed, the board shall meet and receive and adopt it, with any modifications determined upon. After the plan has been adopted, the board shall refer the proceeding to a board of appraisers, to then be appointed by the board of drainage commissioners, consisting of three (3) resident freeholders of any county in which the district is located who are in no way interested in the proceedings and not of kin within the second degree of consanguinity to any person owning land in the proposed district. They shall appraise the property, assessing benefits and damages based on the doing of the work as described and set forth in the plan for reclamation approved by the board. The secretary of the board shall transmit to the appraisers a certified copy of the plan for reclamation which has been approved by the board.

Each appraiser, at a meeting to be held as soon as possible thereafter, shall take and subscribe to an oath that he will faithfully and impartially discharge his duties and make a true report of the work done by him. The appraisers shall, at the same meeting, organize by electing a chairman.

History.

2380b-15: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 236, effective January 2, 1978.

268.270.
Appraisers’ work and report on benefits and damages — Cost of improvement.

Within ten (10) days after being sworn as provided by KRS

268.260

, the appraisers shall begin their duties. They may at any time call upon the attorney of the district for legal advice and information relative to their duties, and the chief engineer or one (1) of his assistants shall accompany them at all times and render his opinion in writing when called for.

The appraisers shall view the premises and determine the value of all property subject to assessment, or which is to be acquired or used as set out in the plan for reclamation. They shall appraise each tract of land separately, and assess the amount of benefits and damages that will accrue to each separate piece of property as a result of execution of the plan for reclamation as adopted by the board.

The appraisers, in assessing the benefits to property not traversed by the improvements as provided for in the plan for reclamation, shall not consider what benefits will be derived by such property after other improvements or plans have been constructed, but they shall assess only the benefits that will be derived from the construction of the improvements set out in the plan for reclamation, or as such improvements may afford an outlet for drainage or protection from overflow of that property. The appraisers shall give due consideration and credit to any other improvements or systems of reclamation that have already been constructed and that afford partial or complete protection to any property in the district. The property shall be assessed according to the increased physical efficiency and decreased annual average maintenance cost by reason of the protection to be derived from the proposed improvements capitalized upon a six percent (6%) basis. The appraisers shall not change or modify the plan for reclamation.

The appraisers shall prepare a written report of their findings, signed by at least two (2) of them. They shall make three (3) copies of the report, to be filed with the secretary of the board. This report shall contain a statement of their findings on the following facts: A description of each parcel of property, as described in the engineer’s report containing the plan for reclamation; the name of the owner; the name of the county in which it is located; the present value of each separate tract of land per acre; the number of acres in each tract; the quantity of land in each tract to be taken or used; the value of the land to be taken or used; the consequential damage to any property that will result from making the improvement; the enhancement of value of each tract, by the acre, which will result from the improvement; the number of acres in each class of benefits as classified by them.

Each tract shall be reported separately. Substantially the following form shall be followed in this particular:

If the appraisers find any property outside of the district that will be damaged by the proposed improvement, or that must be taken for any improvement set out in the plan for reclamation, they shall give the name of the owner and a description of the property separate from the regular report but attached to it.

They shall also, with the advice of the engineer, estimate and tabulate the cost of improvements set out in the plan for reclamation, to include cost of all property, damages, and the probable expenses of organization and administration estimated by the board.

The secretary of the board or his deputy shall accompany the appraisers while engaged in their duties, and shall perform all their clerical work. He shall also, under the supervision of the attorney for the district, prepare their report. The appraisers shall report to the board the number of days each was employed and the actual expenses incurred.

“(Name of district) (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) District, located in the County of , Kentucky. “Name of owner Post office address (Description of land). Located in County. Number of acres in tract Present value of land per acre $ Quantity of land to be taken or used Value of land to be taken or used $ Consequential damages to adjacent lands Enhancement of value of land which will result from the improvement per acre $ No. of acres in tract in class A No. of acres in tract in class B No. of acres in tract in class C No. of acres in tract in class D No. of acres in tract in class E No. of acres in tract in class
Remarks: ”.

Click to view

History.

2380b-16: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 237, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Appraiser’s Report, Form 338.09.

268.280.
Notice of hearing on appraisers’ report — Form.

When the report of the appraisers is filed the secretary shall cause a notice to be sent to each landowner named in the report whose property is shown to be affected by the proposed improvement.

The notice given by the secretary shall be substantially as follows:

The clerk shall also post a copy of the above notice at the front door of the courthouse of the county where the proceeding is pending, within five (5) days after the report is filed in his office, and shall cause it to be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

“In re drainage district No. of County (or of Counties), Kentucky. “Notice is hereby given to all owners of property in (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) district known as (insert name of district), the boundaries of which district are as follows: (here insert boundary description and also a separate description of any property added by the appraisers, together with the name of the owner), and to all persons whose property may be affected, that the board of appraisers has filed in the office of the secretary of the board its report in which it states and shows the benefits, damages and the assessments of benefits made upon all property in the district, the classification thereof and an appraisal of the value of the property necessary to be taken or used, or which will be affected by the making of the improvement. This proceeding is set for hearing on the day of , 19 The report is on file in my office and subject to inspection by any person. Any person desiring to file written objections thereto, must do so on or before the day set for the hearing. Upon your failure to appear or file written objections to the report by that date, it will be construed by the board that you have no reasons to offer why it should not be confirmed. “Done by me as secretary of the board on this the day of , 19 Secretary.”

Click to view

History.

2380b-17: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 192; 1976, ch. 140, § 102; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 238, effective January 2, 1978.

268.290.
Determination of correctness of appraisers’ report — Proceeding to abandon improvement — Action of board — Appeal.

When the hearing is completed, the board shall determine the correctness of the classification and assessment of benefits to each piece of property involved. If no objections are raised to the report of the appraisers, the report shall be considered correct in all respects.

If it appears to the board, after having heard all objections, that the estimated cost of the construction of the proposed improvement contemplated in the plan of reclamation is less than the benefits properly assessed against the property, the board shall then approve and confirm the report of the appraisers as to the classification and assessment of benefits as amended or modified by the board. If it appears to the board that the cost exceeds the benefit accruing to the property in the district, the board shall abandon the proposed improvement.

The board shall state its findings and enter it along with an order approving or disapproving the proposed improvement, and file the same with the secretary of the board, who shall note upon the order the date of its filing.

After the report of the appraisers has been filed, if the owners of seventy-five percent (75%) of the land in the district, or any part of it which is practically separated from the rest, file a petition with the board stating that they desire to abandon the proposed improvement, the board shall abandon it at the cost of the landowners.

Any person may appeal to the Circuit Court within thirty (30) days from the filing of the order of the board. The trial in Circuit Court shall be de novo.

History.

2380b-18: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 103; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 239, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 574, effective June 17, 1978.

268.300.
Form of judgment approving report of appraisers. [Repealed.]

268.310.
Clerk to send corrected report and copy of judgment to secretary of board — Secretary to file — Compensation of clerk. [Repealed]

268.320.
Benefits assessed to certain property — Passage of title to district.

That portion of any piece of property not taken for use of the district shall be assessed for the benefits accruing thereto.

When any property is acquired by any district, and the price has been paid or secured to the owner or paid to the clerk of the court by the board, the title and all rights shall pass from the owner to the district.

History.

2380b-20: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 240, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Compensation for diminution in value of the remainder of property resulting from taking or use of adjoining land of others for the same undertaking. 59 A.L.R.3d 488.

268.330.
Board may borrow money.

When the decision of the board becomes final, the board may borrow any money necessary to carry on the business and work of the district, not exceeding seventy-five percent (75%) of the aggregate assessed benefit as shown by the corrected report of the appraisers. To secure the payment of any loan, the board may pledge the faith and credit of the district. No money shall be borrowed for a longer period of time than the actual needs of the district require, and in no case for more than five (5) years. Every loan shall be repaid as soon as there are sufficient funds in the hands of the treasurer, collected from assessments or realized from a sale of district bonds.

History.

2380b-21: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 241, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Interest, legal rate, KRS

360.010

,

360.020

.

268.340.
Computation of minimum district assessment — District interest assessment — Maximum district assessment.

Within thirty (30) days after the contract for the improvement is let for all the work provided for under the plan for reclamation, or, if the improvements are made directly by the board, as soon as the cost can be ascertained, the board shall ascertain the cost of doing all of the work, and add all expenses incurred in establishing and organizing the district, including all fees to attorneys, engineers, employees, court costs and the damages assessed against the district. To the total of these sums the board shall add ten percent (10%) of the total, to defray the future expenses of the district, including the salaries and fees for services to be thereafter rendered by the members of the board, their agents and employees, including engineers and attorneys, and any other necessary expenses which cannot be foreseen. This aggregate sum shall be called the minimum district assessment. If bonds are to be issued and sold for the district, the board shall then determine the length of time the bonds are to run, and calculate the total amount of interest that will accumulate upon the entire bond issue, the par value of which shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total minimum district assessment. The total of the interest that will accumulate during the period the bonds are to run up till maturity shall be called the district interest assessment. The board shall then add together the two (2) sums, the minimum district assessment and the district interest assessment. The total shall be called amount of which two (2) sums shall constitute the maximum district assessment.

The board shall then ascertain what percent the minimum district assessment is of the total assessed benefits to all property in the district, as shown by the corrected appraisers’ report. The board shall also ascertain what percent the total interest assessment is of the total assessed benefits to all such property.

The board shall then apportion the minimum district assessment to each separate piece of property, so that each shall bear its ratable part of the minimum district assessment. It shall then in like manner apportion the district interest assessment to each piece of property. The board shall then levy a drainage assessment upon the district for the amount of the minimum district assessment, also for the amount of the district interest assessment, and then prepare a drainage assessment record for the district, and as many copies as there are counties in which any part of the district is situated, plus two (2) additional copies, one (1) of which shall be for the board, and the other to remain permanently in the office of the county clerk in the county in which the district is organized.

History.

2380b-22: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 242, effective January 2, 1978.

268.350.
Drainage assessment record form — District assessment table.

The drainage assessment record provided for in KRS

268.340

shall be in substantially the following form:

“Drainage Assessment Record of (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) district, located in the County of , Kentucky. The board of drainage commissioners of County has ascertained from an inspection of the report of the appraisers that the total aggregate of benefits to all of the property in the district is $, and that the cost of making the improvements provided for in the plan for reclamation and the cost of the proceedings in establishing and organizing the district up to this time are $, to which sum we have, as provided by law, added ten percent for the purpose of defraying future expenses and to create an emergency fund, making the total minimum district assessment of $, which we now levy and assess against the district. It is ordered that a district bond issue be authorized of ninety percent of the minimum district assessment of $ , to consist of fifteen series of equal amount, bearing six percent per annum interest payable semiannually. One-fifteenth of the total issue of bonds shall mature and be payable annually. The first series shall become payable five (5) years from the date of issue, and the last series twenty years from the date of issue. “It is ascertained that the total amount of interest that will accumulate on the bonds from the date of issue until maturity will be $, and this board therefore orders that there be levied upon all property in the district an interest assessment amounting to $ “We do hereby apportion both the minimum district assessment and the district interest assessment to each piece of property located in the district, ratably according to the assessment of benefits as appears in the board of appraisers’ assessment of benefits as amended, modified and corrected and shown in the following table: “Table of District Assessments Name of (owner), (railroad), (public highway) Post office address Number of (acres of land), (miles of road) assessed as benefited In what county located Total of benefits assessed amount Total of minimum district assessment amount Total of district interest assessment amount Total assessment maximum “The board of drainage commissioners hereby submits the above as a true and correct assessment roll upon the lands, railroads, public highways and other property subject to assessment in the (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) district, and prays the county judge/executive to confirm it. Respectfully submitted. Board of drainage commissioners of County. By , President. Attest: , Secretary. (Space for correction by clerk upon order of court) The above is a correct assessment. Attest: Clerk.”

Click to view

History.

2308b-22: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 243, effective January 2, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Drainage, Reclamation, and Sewer Districts, § 338.00.